California, session 20252026, AB885.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) According to Georgetown University, over the past 20 years a college degree has increasingly become a prerequisite to a well-paying, stable job.(b) The Public Policy Institute of California found that on average, graduates of California’s public universities earn up to 62 percent more annually than a high school graduate.(c) Over the past 50 years, tuition and fees at the University of California have nearly quadrupled, while at the California State University tuition and fees have jumped sixfold.(d) The cost of attending the University of California has ballooned to over $45,000 annually, $14,934 of which accounts for tuition and fees. At the California State University, tuition and fees average nearly $8,000 annually.(e) According to the Public Policy Institute of California, the high cost of tuition, coupled with California’s high cost of living, forces two-thirds of undergraduates at the University of California and the California State University to take on student debt.(f) Nearly 4,000,000 Californians already owe over $142 billion in student debt, and this acts as a drag on the state’s economy.(g) The lack of an educated workforce will deny the state the ability to draw upon the critical resources that are necessary to assist with the state’s current economic crisis and to support future economic growth.(h) Current budget proposals will jeopardize the enrollment of students at the University of California and the California State University.SEC. 2. Chapter 15.8 (commencing with Section 67394) is added to Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 15.8. Debt Free College at the UC and the CSU College Access for All Fund67394. (a) The Debt Free College at the UC and the CSU College Access for All Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.(b) All moneys in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the University of California and the California State University for purposes of lowering the cost of undergraduate attendance, either through tuition reductions or loan repayment programs, or a combination of tuition reductions and loan repayment programs.